Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2203
Pilot project participants; duties.

The department, its contracted providers of family finding services, and family members of children involved in cases which are part of the pilot project created in section 43-2204 shall participate in family finding. Family finding is the process of engagement, searching, preparation, planning, decisionmaking, lifetime network creation, healing, and permanency in order to:

(1) Search for and identify family members and engage them in planning and decisionmaking;

(2) Gain commitments from family members to support a child through nurturing relationships and to support the parent or parents, when appropriate; and

(3) Achieve a safe, permanent legal home or lifelong connection for the child, either through reunification or through permanent placement through legal guardianship or adoption.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 3.